Illinois, session 104th, SB2882.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The College Campus Press Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 13/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8College Campus Press Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-580, eff. 6-1-08.)